Louisiana, session 2026, HB952.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3519(A), 3530(A)(1), and 3561.1(A) and (B) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 9:3530.1 through 3530.5 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3519. Consumer loans
A. The maximum loan finance charge for any consumer loan other than one
made with a lender credit card that may be charged, contracted for, or received by
a licensed lender or supervised financial organization may equal but not exceed: shall
not exceed the following rates for the respective portions of the unpaid principal
balance of the loan:
(a)(1) Thirty-six percent per year for that portion of the unpaid principal
amount of the loan not exceeding one thousand four hundred two thousand five
hundred dollars;.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1314 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 952
(b)(2) Twenty-seven Twenty-four percent per year for that portion of the
unpaid principal amount of the loan exceeding one thousand four hundred two
thousand five hundred dollars and not exceeding four ten thousand dollars;.
(c)(3) Twenty-four Seventeen percent per year for that portion of the unpaid
principal amount on the loan exceeding four ten thousand dollars. and not exceeding
seven thousand dollars; and
(d) Twenty-one percent per year for that portion of the unpaid principal
amount of the loan exceeding seven thousand dollars.
* * *
§3530. Fees; origination; notary, documentation; over-the-credit-limit fee
A.(1) A lender may charge an origination fee that does not exceed fifty
seventy-five dollars on a consumer loan or revolving loan account.
* * *
§3530.1. Borrowers' assistance notification
In the event of a "major disaster" declaration defined under 42 U.S.C. 5122
(2) by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in this state, if a licensed lender
offers any assistance programs to borrowers impacted by the disaster, the licensed
lender shall notify each borrower within ten days of the licensed lender's
establishment of the program, including the following information, subject to change
as additional declarations are made or revoked:
(1) Licensed locations impacted by the disaster declaration including
physical address, if applicable.
(2) Telephone number, email address, or other contact information for the
licensee.
(3) A brief description of the assistance programs available to borrowers in
the impacted areas.
(4) The start date, and end date if known, of the assistance program.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1314 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 952
§3530.2. Suspension of penalties and remedial measures after disaster declaration
A. In the event of a "major disaster" declaration defined under 42 U.S.C.
5122(2) by the Federal Emergency Management Agency in this state, licensed
lenders operating in the designated parishes shall suspend for a period of sixty days
from the date of the initial declaration, all of the following:
(1) The application of late charges and delinquency fees as provided for in
R.S. 9:3527.
(2) The filing of new actions for repossession of collateral pledged to loans
made under this Chapter.
(3) The filing of new lawsuits for collection of amounts owed for loans made
pursuant to this Chapter.
B. Time delays created by suspensions of action provided for in this Section
shall cease the running of prescription as provided for in Civil Code 3498 until the
lapse of the time frame stated in Subsection A of this Section.
§3530.3. Financial literacy
A. Licensed lenders shall offer borrowers a credit education program or
seminar provided by the licensed lender or a third-party provider, either in writing
or electronically. The credit education program may address the following topics,
including but not limited to:
(1) The importance and methodology of establishing a household budget.
(2) The impact of, value of, and ways to improve a credit score.
(3) The importance and methods of establishing household savings.
(4) Ways to obtain a free copy of a credit report.
(5) Ways to dispute an error in a credit report.
(6) Ways to manage and prevent identity theft.
B. A credit education program or seminar offered in accordance with this
Section shall be offered at no cost to the borrower.
C. A licensed lender shall not require a borrower to participate in a credit
education program or seminar as a condition of a loan.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1314 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 952
§3530.4. Ability to repay
A. A licensed lender shall not make a consumer loan unless the lender
reasonably determines that the borrower has the ability to repay the loan according
to its terms.
B. In making the determination required by this Section, the lender shall
consider the borrower's verified income and existing debt obligations.
C. The lender shall maintain documentation supporting the determination for
examination by the commissioner.
§3530.5. Prepayment
A borrower may prepay a consumer loan in whole or in part at any time
without penalty or additional charge.
* * *
§3561.1. License; examination; renewal fees; records
A. The initial application, survey, and license fee for a license to make
consumer loans shall be six hundred fifty nine hundred dollars payable in a form
acceptable to the commissioner when the application is filed. Such application,
survey, and license fee shall be nonrefundable. If the license is not issued for any
reason, upon written request of the applicant, the fee shall be applied to the
submission of a new application.
B. The annual renewal fee, including examination, shall be five hundred
seven hundred and fifty dollars, payable on or before December thirty-first of each
year.
* * *